Washington statutes.
RCW 36.60.030

Authority of district to provide rail service.

A county rail district is authorized to contract with a person, partnership, or corporation to provide rail service along a light-density essential-service rail line for the purpose of carrying commodities. The district shall also have the power to acquire, maintain, improve, or extend rail facilities within the district that are necessary for the safe and efficient operation of the contracted rail service. A county rail district may receive state rail assistance under chapter 47.76 RCW. Two or more county rail districts may enter into interlocal cooperation agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1983 c 303 s 10.]